Mississippi, session 2026, SB2323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  A retail food establishment may not impose a cost-plus pricing formula on grocery items without publicly posting notice of the cost-plus pricing formula.  Notice shall be sufficient under this subsection if the amount of surcharge to be added to grocery items is conspicuously displayed at the retail food establishment: (a)  A sign on the front sidewalk within fifteen (15) feet of each entrance; and (b)  On a sign inside each entrance. (2)  As used in this section: (a)  "Retail food establishment" means any establishment as defined by Section 69-1-18(1)(b). (b)  "Cost-plus pricing formula" means a formula in which the seller marks items at the item cost and imposes a surcharge in addition to the cost of the item. SECTION 2. (1)  Any person who violates this act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be subject to a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or shall be imprisoned in the county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or both. (2)  Any violation of this act constitutes an unlawful trade practice under Section 75-24-5 and, in addition to any remedies or penalties set forth in this act, shall be subject to any remedies or penalties available for a violation of that statute. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.